Utah statutes.
75-2-704.   Power of appointment -- Meaning of specific reference
requirement.
If a governing instrument creating a power of appointment expressly requires
that the power be exercised by a reference, an express reference, or a
specific reference, to the power or its source, it is presumed that the
donor's intention, in requiring that the donee exercise the power by making
reference to the particular power or to the creating instrument, was to
prevent an inadvertent exercise of the power.
